New Jersey, session 221, A5401.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, public utility means the same as the term is defined in R.S.48:2-13. b.    A public utility that administers a rebate program for the purchase of residential products and appliances bearing the United States Environmental Protection Agencys Energy Star label as part of the public utilitys energy efficiency program or peak demand reduction program, as approved by the Board of Public Utilities pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2018, c.17 (C.48:3-87.9), shall provide the purchaser the option to have the rebate amount deducted from the final sale price of an eligible Energy Star-rated product or appliance at the time of sale. c.     A public utility that administers a rebate program under subsection b. of this section shall determine any requirements for the purchase of an Energy Star-rated product or appliance to be eligible for a rebate. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.